Alabama, session 2026rs, HB326.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 40-9-25.23, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§40-9-25.23
(a) The Most Worshipful Prince Hall Grand Lodge Free
and Accepted Masons of Alabama and the Most Worshipful Grand
Lodge F. and A.M. of Alabama are exempted from paying all
state, county, and municipal fees and taxes until September
30, 2027, unless extended by an act of the Legislature.
(b)(1) The Most Worshipful Prince Hall Grand Lodge Free
and Accepted Masons of Alabama and the Most Worshipful Grand
Lodge F. and A.M. of Alabama, and all other subordinate lodges
Page 1

Lodge F. and A.M. of Alabama, and all other subordinate lodges
HB326 Engrossed
to either lodge above, are exempted from paying all state fees
and taxes.
(2) Any county or municipality may exempt the entities
in (1) from the payment of county or municipal sales and use
taxes in accordance with Section 40-23-4.01, Code of Alabama
1975.
(4) The exemptions provided by this subsection are
effective beginning October 1, 2027.
(c)The Most Worshipful Prince Hall Grand Lodge Free and
Accepted Masons of Alabama and the Most Worshipful Grand Lodge
F. and A.M. of Alabama, shall provide the Department of
Revenue with a list of all subordinate lodges on an annual
basis.
(d) The Department of Revenue shall adopt rules for the
implementation and administration of this act."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on September
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
HB326 Engrossed


House of Representatives
Read for the first time and referred ................22-Jan-26
to the House of Representatives
committee on Ways and Means
Education

Read for the second time and placed ................05-Feb-26
on the calendar:
2 amendments

Read for the third time and passed ................03-Mar-26
as amended
Yeas 103
Nays 0
Abstains 0


John Treadwell
Clerk

Page 3